Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7910.01
Professional health care service entity, defined.

Professional health care service entity means an entity which is organized under the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, the Nebraska Professional Corporation Act, the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, or the Uniform Partnership Act of 1998 and which renders health care services through individuals credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2019, LB119, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB783, § 3.

Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, see section 21-1901.

Nebraska Professional Corporation Act, see section 21-2201.
>
Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, see section 21-101.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.

Uniform Partnership Act of 1998, see section 67-401.